Tennessee, session 114, HB0009.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-3-105(b), is amended by deleting
the language "five percent (5%)" in subdivision (3) and substituting instead the language "ten
percent (10%)" and by redesignating subdivision (5) as subdivision (6) and adding the following
as a new subdivision (5):
(5) The weighted allocation for a student who resides in an LEA with a
membership of:
(A) Between four thousand (4,000) and four thousand nine hundred
ninety-nine (4,999) students, both inclusive, is one percent (1%);
(B) Between three thousand (3,000) and three thousand nine hundred
ninety-nine (3,999) students, both inclusive, is two percent (2%);
(C) Between two thousand (2,000) and two thousand nine hundred
ninety-nine (2,999) students, both inclusive, is three percent (3%); and
(D) Between one thousand (1,000) and one thousand nine hundred
ninety-nine (1,999) students, both inclusive, is four percent (4%); and
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-3-104(18), is amended by
deleting the language "one thousand (1,000) or fewer students" and substituting instead the
language "fewer than one thousand (1,000) students".
HB0009
000089
- 1 -

SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-3-105, is amended by designating
the existing language of subsection (c) as subdivision (c)(1) and adding the following as a new
subdivision (c)(2):
(2) A student generates a direct allocation for the LEA in which the student is a
member in the amount of fifty dollars ($50.00) for maintenance and infrastructure.
SECTION 4. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it,
and applies to the Tennessee investment in student achievement formula for the 2025-2026
school year and each school year thereafter.
- 2 - 000089